Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.24
Food or food ingredients; exemptions.

(1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of food or food ingredients except for prepared food and food sold through vending machines.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Alcoholic beverages means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume;

(b) Dietary supplement means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: (i) A vitamin, (ii) a mineral, (iii) an herb or other botanical, (iv) an amino acid, (v) a dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake, or (vi) a concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredients described in subdivisions (2)(b)(i) through (v) of this section; that is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form or, if not intended for ingestion in such a form, is not presented as conventional food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and that is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the supplemental facts box found on the label and as required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 101.36, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2003;

(c) Food and food ingredients means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. Food and food ingredients does not include alcoholic beverages, dietary supplements, or tobacco;

(d) Food sold through vending machines means food that is dispensed from a machine or other mechanical device that accepts payment;

(e) Prepared food means:

(i) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; or

(ii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item and food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller, except:

(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller;

(B) Eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal Food and Drug Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code, as it existed on January 1, 2003, so as to prevent food borne illnesses;

(C) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American Industry Classification System classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118, bakeries;

(D) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item;

(E) Bakery items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, and tortillas; and

(F) Food that ordinarily requires additional cooking to finish the product to its desired final condition; and

(f) Tobacco means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 44;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 45;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 57;

Laws 2016, LB776, § 1.